Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
CHAPTER 189 Traffic Regulations — Vehicle Equipment and Storage

189.010.
Definitions for chapter.

As used in this chapter:

“Department” means the Department of Highways;

“Crosswalk” means:

That part of a roadway at an intersection within the connections of the lateral lines of the sidewalks on opposite sides of the highway measured from the curbs or in the absence of curbs, from the edges of the traversable roadway; or

Any portion of a roadway at an intersection or elsewhere distinctly indicated for pedestrian crossing by lines or other markings on the surface;

“Highway” means any public road, street, avenue, alley or boulevard, bridge, viaduct, or trestle and the approaches to them and includes private residential roads and parking lots covered by an agreement under KRS

61.362

, off-street parking facilities offered for public use, whether publicly or privately owned, except for-hire parking facilities listed in KRS

189.700

;

“Intersection” means:

The area embraced within the prolongation or connection of the lateral curb lines, or, if none, then the lateral boundary lines of the roadways of two (2) highways which join one another, but do not necessarily continue, at approximately right angles, or the area within which vehicles traveling upon different highways joining at any other angle may come into conflict; or

Where a highway includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more apart, then every crossing of each roadway of such divided highway by an intersecting highway shall be regarded as a separate intersection. If the intersecting highway also includes two (2) roadways thirty (30) feet or more apart, every crossing of two (2) roadways of the highways shall be regarded as a separate intersection. The junction of a private alley with a public street or highway shall not constitute an intersection;

“Manufactured home” has the same meaning as defined in KRS

186.650

;

“Motor truck” means any motor-propelled vehicle designed for carrying freight or merchandise. It shall not include self-propelled vehicles designed primarily for passenger transportation but equipped with frames, racks, or bodies having a load capacity of not exceeding one thousand (1,000) pounds;

“Operator” means the person in actual physical control of a vehicle;

“Pedestrian” means any person afoot or in a wheelchair;

“Right-of-way” means the right of one (1) vehicle or pedestrian to proceed in a lawful manner in preference to another vehicle or pedestrian approaching under such circumstances of direction, speed, and proximity as to give rise to danger of collision unless one grants precedence to the other;

“Roadway” means that portion of a highway improved, designed, or ordinarily used for vehicular travel, exclusive of the berm or shoulder. If a highway includes two (2) or more separate roadways, the term “roadway” as used herein shall refer to any roadway separately but not to all such roadways collectively;

“Safety zone” means the area or space officially set apart within a roadway for the exclusive use of pedestrians and which is protected or is so marked or indicated by adequate signs as to be plainly visible at all times while set apart as a safety zone;

“Semitrailer” means a vehicle designed to be attached to, and having its front end supported by, a motor truck or truck tractor, intended for the carrying of freight or merchandise and having a load capacity of over one thousand (1,000) pounds;

“Truck tractor” means any motor-propelled vehicle designed to draw and to support the front end of a semitrailer. The semitrailer and the truck tractor shall be considered to be one (1) unit;

“Sharp curve” means a curve of not less than thirty (30) degrees;

“State Police” includes any agency for the enforcement of the highway laws established pursuant to law;

“Steep grade” means a grade exceeding seven percent (7%);

“Trailer” means any vehicle designed to be drawn by a motor truck or truck-tractor, but supported wholly upon its own wheels, intended for the carriage of freight or merchandise and having a load capacity of over one thousand (1,000) pounds;

“Unobstructed highway” means a straight, level, first-class road upon which no other vehicle is passing or attempting to pass and upon which no other vehicle or pedestrian is approaching in the opposite direction, closer than three hundred (300) yards;

“Vehicle” includes:

All agencies for the transportation of persons or property over or upon the public highways of the Commonwealth; and

All vehicles passing over or upon the highways.

“Motor vehicle” includes all vehicles, as defined in paragraph (a) of this subsection, except:

Road rollers;

Road graders;

Farm tractors;

Vehicles on which power shovels are mounted;

Construction equipment customarily used only on the site of construction and which is not practical for the transportation of persons or property upon the highways;

Vehicles that travel exclusively upon rails;

Vehicles propelled by electric power obtained from overhead wires while being operated within any municipality or where the vehicles do not travel more than five (5) miles beyond the city limits of any municipality;

Vehicles propelled by muscular power; and

Electric low-speed scooters;

“Reflectance” means the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in a percentage, which is reflected outward by the product or material to the amount of total light falling on the product or material;

“Sunscreening material” means a product or material, including film, glazing, and perforated sunscreening, which, when applied to the windshield or windows of a motor vehicle, reduces the effects of the sun with respect to light reflectance or transmittance;

“Transmittance” means the ratio of the amount of total light, expressed in a percentage, which is allowed to pass through the product or material, including glazing, to the amount of total light falling on the product or material and the glazing;

“Window” means any device designed for exterior viewing from a motor vehicle, except the windshield, any roof-mounted viewing device, and any viewing device having less than one hundred fifty (150) square inches in area;

“All-terrain vehicle” means any motor vehicle used for recreational off-road use;

“Nondivisible load,” as pertains to state highways that are not part of the national truck network established pursuant to 23 C.F.R. pt. 658, means a load or vehicle, that if separated into smaller loads or vehicles:

Compromises the intended use of the vehicle, making it unable to perform the function for which it was intended;

Destroys the value of the load or vehicle, making it unusable for its intended purpose; or

Requires more than four (4) work hours to dismantle and reassemble using appropriate equipment;

“Electric low-speed scooter” means a device that:

Weighs less than one hundred (100) pounds;

Is equipped with wheels;

Is equipped with handlebars;

Is equipped with a brake adequate enough to stop and park the device;

Is designed to be stood or sat upon;

Is propelled by an electric motor, human power, or both; and

Is designed to operate at a maximum speed of twenty (20) miles per hour, on a paved level surface, with or without human propulsion; and

“Highway work zone” means that lane or portion of a state-maintained highway open to vehicular traffic and the affected area adjacent to a lane, berm, or shoulder of a state-maintained highway upon which construction, reconstruction, resurfacing, maintenance, inspection, or other work of that nature is being conducted.

History.

2739g-1, 2739g-69gg, 2739g-80: amend. Acts 1942, ch. 78, §§ 1, 2; 1956 (2nd Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 1; 1958, ch. 126, § 22; 1974, ch. 46, § 1; 1978, ch. 46, § 1, effective June 17, 1978; 1988, ch. 244, § 1, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 400, § 1, effective July 13, 1990; 1994, ch. 42, § 6, effective July 15, 1994; 1996, ch. 327, § 1, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 47, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 270, § 1, effective July 15, 1998; 1998, ch. 587, § 2, effective July 15, 1998; 2017 ch. 35, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 22, § 3, effective June 27, 2019; 2019 ch. 40, § 4, effective June 27, 2019.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/29/2021). Subsection (7)(a) of this statute was amended by Section 7 of 2021 Ky. Acts ch. 186. Section 9 of that Act provides that “Sec- tions 6 to 8 of this Act are part of a pilot program and shall sunset on July 1, 2024.”

189.011.
Additional definitions — Application of light regulations.

As used in this chapter, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings respectively ascribed to them:

“Authorized emergency vehicle” shall mean any vehicle designated as such by KRS

189.910

.

“Wrecker” shall mean a motor vehicle on which a wrecking crane and other equipment suitable for motor vehicle wrecker service has been permanently mounted.

Provided, however, that the regulations in reference to lights shall not apply to common carrier motor vehicles whose equipment is regulated by the rules of the Interstate Commerce Commission.

As used in this chapter, a driver’s license shall mean an operator’s license issued pursuant to KRS

186.4102

,

186.412

, and

186.4121

and a commercial driver’s license means a license issued pursuant to KRS Chapter 281A.

History.

Enact. Acts 1950, ch. 52, § 2; 1970, ch. 93, § 7; 1990, ch. 455, § 31, effective July 13, 1990; 2017 ch. 100, § 30, effective January 1, 2019.

189.012.
Definitions for KRS 189.221 to 189.228. [Repealed.]

189.020.
Equipment of vehicle not to be nuisance or menace.

Every vehicle when on a highway shall be so equipped as to make a minimum of noise, smoke or other nuisance, to protect the rights of other traffic, and to promote the public safety.

History.

2739g-23.

189.025.
Permit required for installation of television set in motor vehicle. [Repealed.]

189.030.
Time when lights must be on.

Headlamps, when required on a vehicle, shall be illuminated:

During the period from one-half (1/2) hour after sunset to one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise; and

At such other times as atmospheric conditions render visibility as low as or lower than is ordinarily the case during that period.

Provisions as to distances that lights must be visible refer to visibility under ordinary atmospheric conditions.

History.

2739g-23, 2739g-24: amend. Acts 2006, ch. 173, § 1, effective July 12, 2006.

189.040.
Front lights — Flashing lights.

Every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle or moped , shall be equipped with at least two (2) headlamps with at least one (1) on each side of the front of the motor vehicle, which headlamps shall comply with the requirements and limitations set forth in this section.

Every motorcycle and moped shall be equipped with at least one (1) and not more than two (2) headlamps which shall comply with the requirements and limitations of this section.

Except as hereinafter provided, the headlamps or the auxiliary driving lamps or the auxiliary passing lamp or combinations thereof on motor vehicles, other than a motorcycle or moped , shall be so arranged that the driver may control the selection between distribution of light projected to different elevations, subject to the following requirements and limitations:

There shall be an uppermost distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed and of such intensity as to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least three hundred fifty (350) feet ahead for all conditions of loading;

There shall be a lowermost distribution of light, or composite beam, so aimed and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least one hundred (100) feet ahead; and on a straight level road under any condition of loading none of the high-intensity portion of the beam shall be directed to strike the eyes of an approaching driver; and

Every new motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle or moped , registered in this state after January 1, 1956, which has multiple-beam road-lighting equipment shall be equipped with a beam indicator, which shall be lighted whenever the uppermost distribution of light from the headlamps is in use, and shall not otherwise be lighted. Said indicator shall be so designed and located that when lighted it will be readily visible without glare to the driver of the vehicle so equipped.

Whenever a motor vehicle is being operated on a roadway or shoulder adjacent thereto during the times specified in KRS

189.030

, the driver shall use a distribution of light or composite beam directed high enough and of sufficient intensity to reveal persons and vehicles at a safe distance in advance of the vehicle, subject to the requirements and limitations hereinafter set forth.

Whenever a driver of a vehicle approaches an oncoming vehicle within five hundred (500) feet, the driver shall use a distribution of light or composite beam, so aimed that the glaring rays are not projected into the eyes of the oncoming driver. The lowermost distribution of light or composite beam specified in paragraph (b) of subsection (3) of this section shall be deemed to avoid glare at all times, regardless of road contour and loading.

Whenever the driver of a vehicle follows another vehicle within three hundred (300) feet to the rear, except when engaged in the act of overtaking and passing, the driver shall use a distribution of light other than the uppermost distribution of light specified in paragraph (a) of subsection (3) of this section.

Headlamps arranged to provide a single distribution of light not supplemented by auxiliary driving lights shall be permitted on motor vehicles manufactured and sold prior to May 30, 1939, in lieu of multiple-beam road-lighting equipment, if the single distribution of light complies with the following requirements and limitations:

The headlamps shall be so aimed that when the vehicle is not loaded none of the high intensity portion of the light shall, at a distance of twenty-five (25) feet ahead, project higher than a level of five (5) inches below the level of the center of the light from which it comes, and in no case higher than forty-two (42) inches above the level on which the vehicle stands, at a distance of seventy-five (75) feet ahead;

The intensity shall be sufficient to reveal persons and vehicles at a distance of at least two hundred (200) feet; and

Whenever the operator of a motor vehicle approaches an oncoming vehicle within five hundred (500) feet, he shall use a distribution of light or composite beam so aimed that the glaring rays are not projected into the eyes of the oncoming driver. In no case shall the high intensity portion which is projected to the left of the prolongation of the extreme left side of the vehicle be aimed higher than the center of the lamp from which it comes at a distance of twenty-five (25) feet ahead, and in no case higher than a level of forty-two (42) inches above the level upon which the vehicle stands at a distance of seventy-five (75) feet ahead.

Flashing lights are prohibited on all motor vehicles except as a means for indicating a right or left turn or for the purpose of warning the operators of other vehicles of the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking or passing.

The height of the headlamps, from the center of the lamp to level ground when the vehicle is unloaded, shall be between twenty-four (24) and fifty-four (54) inches.

Headlamps required under this section shall only emit white light. Halogen headlamps may have a slight yellow or amber tint. Nonhalogen headlamps may emit a slight blue tint, if the headlamps were installed by the vehicle manufacturer as original equipment in the motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped or the headlamps meet the requirements of subsection (11) of this section.

A motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped shall only be equipped with headlamps that meet United States Department of Transportation regulations.

A motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped shall not be retrofitted with a headlamp that appears to emit a solid color of light other than white.

A motor vehicle, motorcycle, or moped shall not be retrofitted with a headlamp cover or film that changes the light emitted from the headlamp to a color other than white.

Except as provided in subsection (10) of this section, except as provided in KRS

189.950

(3)(b), and except for vehicles exempted under the provisions of KRS

189.910

to

189.950

, when operating on a highway or upon the right-of-way of a highway, any:

Visible front lights on a motor vehicle or any light that is affixed to the front of a motorcycle or moped, shall only be white or amber, unless installed as original equipment by the manufacturer; and

Visible rear lights on a motor vehicle shall only be white, amber, or red, unless installed as original equipment by the manufacturer.

Any violation of this section for the illumination of a solid blue light or solid blue lights shall be deemed to be a violation of KRS 189.950(3).

HISTORY:

2739g-24: amend. Acts 1950, ch. 52, § 1; 1954, ch. 248, § 1; 1960, ch. 54; 1964, ch. 65, § 1; 1966, ch. 18, § 3; 1966, ch. 50, § 2; 1966, ch. 73, § 1; 1966, ch. 227, § 1; 1970, ch. 93, § 8; 1974, ch. 101, § 2; 1978, ch. 349, § 7, effective June 17, 1978; 2006, ch. 173, § 2, effective July 12, 2006; 2017 ch. 79, § 2, effective June 29, 2017.

189.043.
Flashing white or amber lights to warn of traffic hazard permitted.

Notwithstanding any other provisions against the use of flashing lights, any vehicle may be equipped with lamps which may be used for the purpose of warning the operators of other vehicles of the presence of a vehicular traffic hazard requiring the exercise of unusual care in approaching, overtaking or passing and when so equipped may display such warning in addition to any other warning signals required by law. The lamps used to display such warning to the front shall be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and shall display simultaneously flashing white or amber lights, or any shade of color between white and amber. The lamps used to display such warning to the rear shall be mounted at the same level and as widely spaced laterally as practicable, and shall show simultaneously flashing amber or red lights, or any shade of color between amber and red. These warning lights shall be visible from a distance of not less than fifteen hundred (1,500) feet under normal atmospheric conditions at night.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 50, § 1.

189.045.
Flashing lights prohibited near highway.

No person shall install or maintain a red, yellow, green or similarly colored flashing light within one hundred (100) feet of the right-of-way of a state maintained highway for any purposes other than safety, highway construction, or emergency purposes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1960, ch. 148, § 5 (1).

Opinions of Attorney General.

A red flashing light placed in front of a business within 100 feet of a state maintained highway strictly as a burglar alarm, which is activated only by breaking into the premises and at all other times inactive, comes under the definition of emergency purposes.

OAG 74-517

.

189.047.
Blue flashing lights, officers only may use. [Repealed.]

189.050.
Rear, side, and clearance lights and lanterns.

All motor vehicles shall display at the rear two (2) red lights visible when lighted for at least five hundred (500) feet, unless the motor vehicle was originally equipped with only one (1) such light.

A person shall not operate any motor truck or semitrailer truck on any highway unless it is equipped with a red light that automatically indicates the application of brakes and is visible from the rear a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet.

No person shall operate on any highway a motor truck or semitrailer truck having a width of any part in excess of eighty-four (84) inches, unless it carries at least two (2) clearance lights to indicate the outside left limit of the motor truck or semitrailer truck, one (1) light colored white, to be attached to and be visible from the front of the motor truck or semitrailer truck, and two (2) lights colored red, to be attached to and be visible from the rear, in each case a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet.

When in operation on any highway, slow-moving or motorless vehicles, except bicycles and electric low-speed scooters, shall have at least one (1) light on the left side of the vehicle whether from the front or rear, showing white and of sufficient power to reveal clearly the outline of the left side of the vehicle and in such a manner that the outline may be observed clearly by approaching vehicles from a distance of at least five hundred (500) feet.

When in operation between sunset and sunrise on any highway, motorless vehicles, except bicycles and electric low-speed scooters, shall have in operation:

A four (4) way flasher system, with two (2) flashing yellow or amber lights visible from the front of the vehicle for a distance of at least five hundred (500) feet and two (2) flashing red lights visible from the rear of the vehicle for a distance of at least five hundred (500) feet; or

Two (2) reflective lanterns, one (1) on either side of the rear of the vehicle, showing white to the front of the vehicle and red to the rear of the vehicle, with the lantern on the left side of the vehicle situated at least twelve (12) inches higher than the lantern on the right.

History.

2739g-24, 2739g-50, 2739g-89, 2739g-90: amend. Acts 1966, ch. 73, § 2; 1974, ch. 101, § 3; 2006, ch. 105, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 173, § 3, effective July 12, 2006; 2012, ch. 53, § 1, effective April 11, 2012; 2019 ch. 22, § 6, effective June 27, 2019.

189.055.
Brake lights.

A person shall not operate any vehicle required by law to be licensed upon a highway unless it is equipped with a mechanical signal device which would indicate an intention to stop or suddenly decrease speed by illuminating at least two (2) red lights on the rear of the vehicle, which are visible from the rear a distance of not less than five hundred (500) feet, unless the vehicle was originally manufactured with only one (1) such red light on the rear of the vehicle.

History.

Enact. Acts 1970, ch. 9, § 1; 2006, ch. 173, § 4, effective July 12, 2006.

189.060.
Lights on vehicles in tow and projections — Motor vehicle used as towing unit.

Each vehicle towed by a towline shall display the lights required on vehicles of the class to which it belongs.

Each vehicle being hauled by another and connected to it in a manner that will keep them uniformly spaced shall carry at least one (1) light on the left side in such a manner as to show an amber light to the front and a red light to the rear visible at least one thousand (1,000) feet away.

When any part of a load projects more than four (4) feet beyond a vehicle, two (2) red flags by day and two (2) red lights during the period provided in KRS

189.030

must be placed upon the extremity of the projection marking the width of the overhang.

Any motor vehicle used as a towing unit where two (2) lamps displaying red lights are not obscured by the towed unit or its load may be equipped with two (2) lamps displaying red lights on the towed unit, the towing unit, or both.

History.

2739g-29 to 2739g-31: amend. Acts 2006, ch. 72, § 1, effective July 12, 2006; 2006, ch. 173, § 5, effective July 12, 2006.

Legislative Research Commission Note.

(7/12/2006). This section was amended by 2006 Ky. Acts chs. 72 and 173, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been compiled together.

189.070.
Motor vehicles to carry and use required flares or similar signals.

A person shall not operate any commercial motor vehicle upon a highway outside of a business or residence district at any time from one-half (1/2) hour before sunset to one-half (1/2) hour before sunrise unless that vehicle carries the number and type of flares, electric lanterns, or other signals which the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall by regulation require.

Whenever any commercial motor vehicle and its lighting equipment are disabled during a period when lighted lamps must be illuminated on vehicles and the vehicle cannot immediately be removed from the main traveled portion of a highway outside of a business or residence district, the person in charge of the vehicle shall cause to be placed upon the highway such flares, lanterns, and other signals as the Department of Vehicle Regulation shall by regulation require, and such flares, lanterns, or other signals shall be utilized as required by the regulations.

History.

2739g-69d: amend. Acts 1962, ch. 91, § 1; 2006, ch. 173, § 6, effective July 12, 2006.

189.080.
Horns and other sound devices.

Every motor vehicle, when in use on a highway, shall be equipped with a horn or other device capable of making an abrupt sound sufficiently loud to be heard from a distance of at least two hundred (200) feet under all ordinary traffic conditions. Every person operating an automobile or bicycle shall sound the horn or sound device whenever necessary as a warning of the approach of such vehicle to pedestrians or other vehicles, but shall not sound the horn or sound device unnecessarily. A bell may be used on a bicycle.

History.

2739g-28: amend. Acts 1952, ch. 167; 1970, ch. 93, § 9; 1974, ch. 101, § 4; 2006, ch. 173, § 7, effective July 12, 2006.

189.090.
Brakes.

No owner shall knowingly operate or permit to be operated on a highway a motor vehicle upon which the brakes are defective.

Every motor vehicle, other than a motorcycle, when operated upon a highway shall be equipped with brakes adequate to control the movement of and to stop and hold the vehicle. There shall be two (2) separate means of applying the brakes, each of which means shall be effective to apply the brakes to at least two (2) wheels. If the two (2) separate means are connected in any way, they shall be so constructed that failure of any one (1) part of the operating mechanism shall not leave the motor vehicle without brakes on at least two (2) wheels.

Except for commercial motor vehicles with a declared gross vehicle weight of more the ten thousand (10,000) pounds, the service brakes upon any motor vehicle or combination of vehicles shall be adequate to stop the vehicle when traveling twenty (20) miles per hour within a distance of forty (40) feet when upon dry asphalt or concrete pavement surface free from loose material where the grade does not exceed one percent (1%).

Under the conditions described in subsection (3)(a), the hand brake shall be adequate to stop the vehicle within a distance of fifty-five (55) feet and the hand brake shall be adequate to hold the vehicle stationary on any grade upon which it is operated.

Under the conditions described in subsection (3)(a), the service brakes upon a motor vehicle equipped with two (2)-wheel brakes only shall be adequate to stop the vehicle within a distance of forty (40) feet and the hand brake adequate to stop the vehicle within a distance of fifty-five (55) feet.

All braking distances specified in this section shall apply whether or not the vehicles are loaded to the maximum capacity permitted by law.

All brakes shall be maintained in good working order and shall be so adjusted as to operate with equal effect with respect to the wheels on opposite sides of the vehicle.

A person shall not operate any commercial motor vehicle with a declared gross weight of over ten thousand (10,000) pounds on any highway in this state unless it is equipped with efficient brakes that meet the federal motor carrier safety standards in 49 C.F.R. pt. 393 and may be operated by the operator of the vehicle.

History.

2739g-26, 2739g-88: amend. Acts 1976, ch. 173, § 2; 2006, ch. 173, § 8, effective July 12, 2006.

189.095.
Brake linings, sale when not of approved type prohibited.

On and after January 1, 1967, it shall be unlawful to sell, or to display for sale, any brake lining unless of a type which has been submitted to the secretary of the Transportation Cabinet for approval and for which a certificate of approval has been issued by the secretary and is then in effect; provided, however, that no owner of a motor vehicle shall be required to replace brake linings which were installed before June 16, 1966 solely because such linings have not been approved in accordance with the provisions of this section.

The secretary shall, in order to insure safe operation of motor vehicles, prescribe uniform specifications as to the stopping ability, pedal force, lining integrity, stability, fade and recovery characteristic requirements of brake linings and shall determine whether any brake lining submitted complies with such rules and uniform standards; provided, however, that in order to promote uniformity between the states and thereby avoid increased costs to the people of this state, due to the necessity of complying with diverse requirements in the distribution and sale of brake linings, the secretary is hereby authorized to adopt and maintain the standards and specifications which are adopted by the several states pursuant to the procedures of the Vehicle Equipment Safety Compact, or those of the Society of Automotive Engineers, whichever in the discretion of the secretary will better protect the safety of the people of this state.

History.

Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 113, §§ 1, 2.

189.100.
Steering device not to be defective.

No owner shall knowingly operate or permit to be operated on a highway a motor vehicle upon which the steering device is defective.

History.

2739g-27.

189.110.
Unobstructed windshields — Display of American flag — Windshield wipers.

A windshield in a fixed and upright position, that is equipped with safety glazing as required by federal safety-glazing material standards, is required on every motor vehicle which is operated on the public highways, roads, and streets, except on a motorcycle or implement of husbandry.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle on a public highway, road, or street with any sign, sunscreening material, product, or covering attached to, or located in or upon the windshield, except the following:

A certificate or other paper required to be displayed by law;

Sunscreening material along a strip at the top of the windshield, if the material is transparent and does not encroach upon the driver’s direct forward viewing area as defined in Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standards No. 205 as the AS/1 portion of the windshield.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle required to be registered in the Commonwealth, on a public highway, road, or street on which vehicle the side wings and side windows on either side forward of or adjacent to the operator’s seat are composed of, covered by, or treated with any sunscreening material or other product or covering which has the effect of making the window nontransparent or which would alter the window’s color, increase its reflectivity, or reduce its light transmittance, except as expressly permitted by this section. A sunscreening material may be applied to the windows if, when tested on one-eighth (1/8) inch clear glass, the material has a total solar reflectance of visible light of not more than twenty-five percent (25%) as measured on the nonfilm side and a light transmittance of at least thirty-five percent (35%) in the visible light range.

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle required to be registered in the Commonwealth, on a public highway, road, or street on which vehicle any windows behind the driver are composed of, covered by, or treated with any sunscreening material, or other product or material which has the effect of making the window nontransparent or which would alter the window’s color, increase its reflectivity, or reduce its light transmittance, except as specified below:

Sunscreen material consisting of film which, when tested on one-eighth (1/8) inch clear glass, has a total solar reflectance of visible light of not more than thirty-five percent (35%) as measured on the nonfilm side and a light transmittance of at least eighteen percent (18%) in the visible light range; however, sunscreen material which, when tested on one-eighth (1/8) inch clear glass, has a total solar reflectance of visible light of not more than thirty-five percent (35%) as measured on the nonfilm side and a light transmittance of at least eight percent (8%) in the visible light range may be used on multipurpose passenger vehicles;

Perforated sunscreening material which, when tested in conjunction with existing glazing or film material, has a total reflectance of visible light of not more than thirty-five percent (35%) and a light transmittance of no less than thirty percent (30%). For those products or materials having different levels of reflectance, the highest reflectance from the product or material will be measured by dividing the area into sixteen (16) equal sections and averaging the overall reflectance. The measured reflectance of any of those sections may not exceed fifty percent (50%).

A person shall not operate a motor vehicle required to be registered in the Commonwealth, upon a public highway, road, or street, on which vehicle the rear window is composed of, covered by, or treated with any material which has the effect of making the window nontransparent, unless the vehicle is equipped with side mirrors on both sides.

Each installer or seller of sunscreening material shall provide a pressure-sensitive, self-destructive, nonremovable, vinyl-type film label to the purchaser stating that the material complies with the provisions of KRS 189.010(20) to (23) and subsections (1) to (5) of this section. Each installer shall affix the required label to the inside left door jamb of the motor vehicle. In addition, the label shall state the trade name of the material and the installer’s or seller’s business name. Labeling is not required for factory glazing which complies with Federal Motor Vehicle Safety Standard No. 205.

Every percentage measurement required by subsections (3) and (4) of this section is subject to a tolerance of plus or minus three percent (3%).

A person shall not install window tinting materials on a vehicle that fails to meet the minimum standards for light transmission pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of this section. Tinted material that fails to meet the minimum standards for light transmission pursuant to subsections (3) and (4) of this section shall be removed immediately.

A person who applies sunscreening materials in violation of this section shall be guilty upon conviction of a Class B misdemeanor.

Nothing in this section shall prevent the display of a representation of the American flag on the rear window of any motor vehicle, including any vehicle owned by a local or state government, provided that the representation does not exceed a size of five (5) inches by eight (8) inches and is placed in a lower corner of the rear window.

The windshield on every motor vehicle shall be equipped with a device for cleaning rain, snow or other moisture from the windshield. The device shall be so constructed as to be controlled by the operator of the vehicle.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to prevent the use of any window which is composed of, covered by, or treated with any material or component in a manner approved by federal statute or regulation if the window was a component part of a vehicle at the time of the vehicle manufacture, or the replacement of any window by a covering which meets these requirements.

History.

2739g-69c: amend. Acts 1970, ch. 283, § 1; 1988, ch. 244, § 2, effective July 15, 1988; 1994, ch. 42, § 11, effective July 15, 1994.

189.120.
Safety glass required in motor vehicles.

No person shall sell any new motor vehicle in this state nor shall any new motor vehicle be registered in this state unless the vehicle is equipped with safety glass wherever glass is used in the windshield, doors or windows.

As used in this section, “safety glass” means any product composed of glass, so manufactured, fabricated, or treated as substantially to prevent shattering and flying of the glass when struck or broken, or such other or similar product as may be approved by the Department of Vehicle Regulation.

The Department of Vehicle Regulation shall compile and publish a list of types of glass by name approved by the department as meeting the requirements of this section, and shall cause a copy of the list to be furnished to each county clerk. No motor vehicle which is subject to the provisions of this section shall be registered unless it is equipped with an approved type of safety glass as required by this section, and the Department of Vehicle Regulation may prescribe and enforce such regulations as are necessary to effectuate this section. If the rules of the Interstate Commerce Commission differ the common carriers may elect to apply the rules of the Interstate Commerce Commission.

History.

2739g-28a, 2739g-28b: amend. Acts 1948, ch. 171, § 1; 1956, ch. 136; 1958, ch. 126, § 24; 1978, ch. 384, § 334, effective June 17, 1978.